test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-82pueuedmae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `püüdmä: # Verb (82) `püüdmä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     püüdmä+V+Inf/mA: püüdmä
     püüdmä+V+Inf: püüdäq
     püüdmä+V+Act+PrfPrc: püüdnüq
     püüdmä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [püvvet, püvvetü]

     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: püvvä
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [püvvät, püvvädeq]
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: püüd
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: püvvämiq
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: püvvätiq
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: püüdväq
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: püvvä
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [püvvi, püüdse]
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [püvvit, püvviq, püvvideq, püüdset, püüdseq, püüdsedeq]
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [püüd́, püüdse]
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [püvvimiq, püüdsemiq]
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [püvvitiq, püüdsetiq]
     püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [püvviq, püvviväq, püüdseq, püüdseväq]

     püüdmä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: püvvedä
     püüdmä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: püvvetäs

     püüdmä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: püüdvä

     püüdmä+V+Jus: püüdkuq
